pl: Dołączona dokumentacja statku powietrznego: Certyfikat zgodności (CoC); Formularz EASA 1; Formularz FAA 8130-3; ICA (Instrukcje ciągłej zdatności do lotu); Instrukcje instalacji; Kopia wpisu do dziennika lotów; Certyfikat zwolnienia do eksploatacji / przywieszka; Brak dokumentacji; Inne
bg-BG: Включена документация за самолета: Сертификат за съответствие (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Инструкции за продължаване на летателната годност); Инструкции за монтаж; Копие от запис в дневника; Свидетелство/етикет за техническо обслужване; Няма документация; Други
pt-BR: Documentação da aeronave incluída: Certificado de Conformidade (CoC); Formulário EASA 1; Formulário FAA 8130-3; ICA (Instruções para Aeronavegabilidade Continuada); Instruções de instalação; Cópia de registro de diário de bordo; Etiqueta/liberação de manutenção; Sem documentação; Outros
nb: Flydokumentasjon inkludert: Samsvarssertifikat (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (instruksjoner for fortsatt luftdyktighet); Installasjonsinstruksjoner; Kopi av loggbokoppføring; Vedlikeholdsbevis/-merkelapp; Ingen dokumentasjon; Annet
lt-LT: Pridedami orlaivio dokumentai: Atitikties sertifikatas (CoC); EASA 1 forma; FAA 8130-3 forma; ICA (Tolesnio skraidomumo palaikymo instrukcijos); Montavimo instrukcijos; Žurnalo įrašo kopija; Techninės priežiūros patvirtinimas / etiketė; Be dokumentacijos; Kita
da: Dokumentation for luftfartøjet inkluderet: Overensstemmelsescertifikat (CoC); EASA form 1; FAA form 8130-3; ICA (instruktioner for fortsat luftdygtighed); Installationsvejledning; Kopi af logbogsnotat; Vedligeholdelsesfrigivelse/mærkat; Ingen dokumentation; Andet
de: Enthaltene Flugzeugdokumentation: Konformitätserklärung (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Anweisungen zur Aufrechterhaltung der Lufttüchtigkeit); Installationsanleitung; Kopie des Bordbucheintrags; Freigabebescheinigung/Wartungsanhänger; Keine Dokumentation; Andere
th: เอกสารเกี่ยวกับอากาศยานที่มีให้: ใบรับรองความสอดคล้อง (CoC); แบบฟอร์ม EASA 1; แบบฟอร์ม FAA 8130-3; ICA (คำแนะนำสำหรับความสมควรเดินอากาศต่อเนื่อง); คำแนะนำในการติดตั้ง; สำเนาบันทึกปูมเดินทาง; ป้าย/ใบรับรองการบำรุงรักษา; ไม่มีเอกสาร; อื่นๆ
vi: Tài liệu máy bay kèm theo: Giấy chứng nhận hợp quy (CoC); Mẫu EASA 1; Mẫu FAA 8130-3; ICA (Hướng dẫn duy trì đủ điều kiện bay); Hướng dẫn lắp đặt; Bản sao nhật ký; Giấy chứng nhận/thẻ bảo dưỡng; Không có tài liệu; Khác
sl-SI: Vključena dokumentacija letala: Potrdilo o skladnosti (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Navodila za stalno plovnost); Navodila za namestitev; Kopija vpisa v tehnični dnevnik; Potrdilo/oznaka o vzdrževanju; Brez dokumentacije; Drugo
pt-PT: Documentação da aeronave incluída: Certificado de conformidade (CoC); Formulário 1 da EASA; Formulário 8130-3 da FAA; ICA (instruções para a aeronavegabilidade contínua); Instruções de instalação; Cópia do registo do diário de bordo; Certificado de manutenção/etiqueta; Sem documentação; Outro
ja: 航空機の文書が含まれています: 適合証明書 (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (継続堪航性に関する指示書); 取付説明書; ログブック記載コピー; メンテナンスリリース/タグ; ドキュメントなし; その他
cs: Součástí je dokumentace k letadlu: Osvědčení o shodě (CoC); Formulář EASA 1; Formulář FAA 8130-3; ICA (pokyny pro zachování letové způsobilosti); Pokyny k instalaci; Kopie záznamu v deníku; Osvědčení / štítek o uvolnění do provozu; Bez dokumentace; Ostatní
hu: Repülőgép dokumentációja mellékelve: Megfelelőségi nyilatkozat (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Folyamatos légialkalmassági utasítások); Telepítési útmutató; Naplóbejegyzés-másolat; Karbantartási tanúsítvány/címke; Nincs dokumentáció; Egyéb
en: Aircraft documentation included: Certificate of Conformance (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Instructions for Continued Airworthiness); Installation instructions; Logbook entry copy; Maintenance release/tag; No documentation; Other
nl: Meegeleverde vliegtuigdocumentatie: Conformiteitscertificaat (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (instructies voor aanhoudende luchtwaardigheid); Installatie-instructies; Kopie logboekvermelding; Onderhoudsvrijgave/label; Geen documentatie; Overig
zh-TW: 包含飛機文件: 符合性聲明 (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (持續適航文件); 安裝說明; 飛行日誌紀錄副本; 維修放行單/標籤; 無文件; 其他
fi: Mukana tulevat lentokoneen asiakirjat: Vaatimustenmukaisuustodistus (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Jatkuvan lentokelpoisuuden ohjeet); Asennusohjeet; Kopio lokikirjamerkinnästä; Huoltotodistus/-lappu; Ei asiakirjoja; Muu
sv: Flygplansdokumentation som ingår: Överensstämmelseintyg (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (instruktioner för fortsatt luftvärdighet); Installationsanvisningar; Kopia av loggboksanteckning; Underhållsintyg/-etikett; Ingen dokumentation; Övrigt
sk-SK: Dokumentácia k lietadlu je súčasťou balenia: Osvedčenie o zhode (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Pokyny na zachovanie letovej spôsobilosti); Pokyny na inštaláciu; Kópia záznamu v letovom denníku; Osvedčenie o údržbe/štítok; Žiadna dokumentácia; Iné
tr: Uçağa ait dokümanlar dahildir.: Uygunluk Sertifikası (CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA (Sürekli Uçuşa Elverişlilik Talimatları); Kurulum talimatları; Kayıt defteri girişi kopyası; Bakım onay sertifikası/etiketi; Belge yok; Diğer
es: Documentación del avión incluida: Certificado de conformidad (CoC); Formulario 1 de la EASA; Formulario 8130-3 de la FAA; ICA (Instrucciones para la aeronavegabilidad continua); Instrucciones de instalación; Copia de entrada en el libro de registro; Etiqueta/certificado de mantenimiento; Sin documentación; Otro
ru: Документация на самолет  в комплекте: Сертификат соответствия (CoC); Форма 1 EASA; Форма 8130-3 FAA; ICA (Инструкции по поддержанию летной годности); Инструкции по установке; Копия записи в бортовом журнале; Свидетельство/талон о техническом обслуживании; Без документации; Другое
el: Περιλαμβάνεται τεκμηρίωση αεροσκάφους: Πιστοποιητικό συμμόρφωσης (CoC); Έντυπο 1 της EASA (EASA Form 1); Έντυπο FAA 8130-3; ICA (Οδηγίες συνεχούς αξιοπλοΐας); Οδηγίες εγκατάστασης; Αντίγραφο καταχώρησης ημερολογίου; Πιστοποιητικό/ετικέτα αποδέσμευσης συντήρησης; Χωρίς τεκμηρίωση; Άλλο
zh-CN: 包括飞机文件: 合格证书 (CoC); EASA 表格 1; FAA 表格 8130-3; ICA（持续适航说明）; 安装说明; 飞行记录本条目副本; 维护放行证明/标签; 无文档; 其他
hr-HR: Uključena dokumentacija zrakoplova: Potvrda o sukladnosti (CoC); EASA Obrazac 1; FAA Obrazac 8130-3; ICA (Upute za kontinuiranu plovidbenost); Upute za instalaciju; Kopija unosa u dnevnik; Odobrenje / oznaka za održavanje; Bez dokumentacije; Ostalo
it: Documentazione dell'aeromobile inclusa: Certificato di conformità (CoC); EASA Form 1; Modulo FAA 8130-3; ICA (Istruzioni per l'aeronavigabilità continua); Istruzioni di installazione; Copia della registrazione nel logbook; Rilascio/etichetta di manutenzione; Nessuna documentazione; Altro
ro-RO: Documentație a aeronavei inclusă: Certificat de conformitate (CoC); Formular EASA 1; Formular FAA 8130-3; ICA (Instrucțiuni pentru menținerea navigabilității); Instrucțiuni de instalare; Copie după înregistrarea în jurnal; Certificat/etichetă de eliberare după întreținere; Fără documentație; Altele
ko: 포함된 항공기 관련 서류: 적합성 인증서(CoC); EASA Form 1; FAA Form 8130-3; ICA(지속적 감항성 유지 지침); 설치 지침; 로그북 항목 사본; 유지보수 릴리스/태그; 문서 없음; 기타
fr: Documentation fournie pour l’avion: Certificat de conformité (CoC); Formulaire EASA 1; Formulaire FAA 8130-3; ICA (Instructions pour le maintien de la navigabilité); Instructions d’installation; Copie de l’entrée du carnet de vol; Certificat/étiquette de remise en service; Aucune documentation; Autre